Utah statutes.
3-1-13.4.   Indemnification of officers, directors, employees, fiduciaries,
and agents.
(1)  The association shall have the same powers, rights, and obligations and
shall be subject to the same liabilities as apply to corporations for profit
as set forth in Sections 16-10a-901 through 16-10a-909.
(2) (a)  Association directors, officers, employees, fiduciaries, and agents
shall have the same rights of indemnification as directors, officers,
employees, fiduciaries, and agents, respectively, of corporations for profit
as set forth in Sections 16-10a-901 through 16-10a-909.
(b)  A reference in Sections 16-10a-901 through 16-10a-909:
(i)  to shareholders shall be construed to refer to voting members or
shareholders for the purpose of this section; and
(ii)  to corporations shall be construed to refer to associations.
